Louisiana, session 2026, HB182.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1216.1(A)(introductory paragraph) and (H)(3) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1216.1(H)(8) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1216.1. Procedures for survivors of a sexually oriented criminal offense;
immunity; regional plans; maximum allowable costs; definitions; documents
requested by victim
A. All licensed hospitals and healthcare providers in Louisiana shall offer
every sexual assault survivor information to receive the treatment provided for in this
Section. All licensed hospitals with an emergency department shall maintain and
make available a qualified healthcare professional to provide treatment and forensic
examinations to victims of sexual assault during the emergency department's hours
of operation. A licensed hospital or healthcare provider shall adhere to the following
procedures if a person presents for treatment as a sexual assault survivor:
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-264 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 182
H. For purposes of this Section the following definitions apply:
* * *
(3) "Healthcare provider" means either of the following: a facility or
institution providing healthcare services including but not limited to a hospital or
other licensed inpatient center; ambulatory surgical or treatment center; skilled
nursing facility; inpatient hospice facility; residential treatment center; diagnostic,
laboratory, or imaging center; or rehabilitation or other therapeutic health setting.
(a) A physician, sexual assault nurse examiner, or other healthcare
practitioner licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized and trained to
perform a forensic medical examination.
(b) A facility or institution providing healthcare services, including but not
limited to a hospital or other licensed inpatient center; ambulatory surgical or
treatment center; skilled nursing facility; inpatient hospice facility; residential
treatment center; diagnostic, laboratory, or imaging center; or rehabilitation or other
therapeutic health setting.
* * *
(8) "Qualified healthcare professional" means a physician, sexual assault
nurse examiner, or other healthcare practitioner licensed, certified, registered, or
otherwise authorized and trained to perform a forensic medical examination. This
may be accomplished through an agreement with a parish or regional sexual assault
nurse examiner program, an on call sexual assault nurse examiner employed or
contracted by the hospital, or a physician or medical provider with documented
training and proficiency on the performance of a forensic medical examination.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on August 1, 2028.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-264 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 182